Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.100

Regents—Appointment—Terms—Vacancies—Quorum.

(1)(a) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested in a board of regents to consist of 11 members, one of whom shall be a student and one of whom shall be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty.

(b) The members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for the student member and faculty member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified.

(c) The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. The student member shall hold the office for a term of one year from the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year or until a successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.

(d) The governor shall select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least two and not more than five, submitted by the faculty senate. The faculty member shall hold the office for a term of three years from the first day of October and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.

(3) Except for the term of the student member and the faculty member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.

(4) A student appointed under this section may not participate or vote on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel. A faculty member appointed under this section may not participate or vote on matters related to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of specific faculty members.

[ 2022 c 12 s 1; 2006 c 78 s 1; 1998 c 95 s 1; 1985 c 61 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 2; 1973 c 62 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.100. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 239 s 3; RRS s 4554; prior: 1897 c 118 s 184; 1895 c 101 s 1; 1890 p 396 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.77.090, 28.77.100, part.]

NOTES:

Present terms not affected—1979 ex.s. c 103: "Nothing in sections 2 through 6 of this amendatory act shall shorten the terms of regents or trustees presently in office." [ 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 7.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 103: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 8.]

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.